hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX V		 ar		 aría		afinar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		agar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aguar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aguazar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ajar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ajustar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alabrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alancear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alayar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aldar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aldear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alificar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aliñar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		allar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		almar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alonear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alpar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alquilar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alsar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		altar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		altear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		alzar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		amar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		amblar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ambrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		amentar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aminar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ampar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ampear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		anar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		añar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ancar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ancear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		anchar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		anciar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		andar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		andear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		anear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		angar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		angular
SFX V		 ar		 aría		animar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		anizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		anquear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ansar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		antar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		antear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		antillar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		antizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		anular
SFX V		 ar		 aría		apar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aparrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		apear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		apodar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		apolillar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aponar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aporcar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		apuntalar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		apuntar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aquear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arbear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arbillar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arbolar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arcar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		archar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		argar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ariar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		armentar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arolar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arquear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arrear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		arrilar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		artar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		artillar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		asar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ascar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ascular
SFX V		 ar		 aría		asear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		asificar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aspear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		astar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atacar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atatar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ataviar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atentar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atificar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atinar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atorar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		atusar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aucar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		avar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ayar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		azar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		aznar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		balizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bañar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bernar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		betear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		biar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bijar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bilar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		billar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		binar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		blar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bletear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bonar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bonear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		botar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		botear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bozar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		brar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		brear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bucear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bufar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bujar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bular
SFX V		 ar		 aría		bullar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cabestrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cabritar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cachetear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		calar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		calificar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		callar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		calzar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		canear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cantar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		car
SFX V		 ar		 aría		carar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		carrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cascar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		catar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		catear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		caucionar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ccionar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cebadar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		celar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cenar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		centar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cepar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cerar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cercar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cerrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		char
SFX V		 ar		 aría		chear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		chichear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		chivar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		chuchear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		churrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ciar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cidar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cinar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cionar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		citar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		clamar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		clar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		colar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		colgar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		colonizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		compadrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		conear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		consolar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		convocar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		corar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		corchar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cordar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cordelar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		coriar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cornar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cosar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cotar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		crar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		criminar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ctar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cuar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cuestar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cuidar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cular
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cultar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cunar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		cursar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dalar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		decentar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		decorar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		delar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		denar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dentar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		derar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		derezar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		diar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dibujar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dicar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dillar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dimentar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dinar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dinerar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ditar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		doblar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		doctrinar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		donar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dorar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dosar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dramatizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		drapear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		drar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ducar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		dular
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ecar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		echar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ectar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		edar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ediar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		editar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		edrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		egar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		egrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ejar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ejear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		elar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		elegar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		elizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ellar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		emar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		embozar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		eminar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		emorizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		empeñar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		empotrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		encallar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		encaminar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		encar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		encasquillar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enciar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		endar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enerar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enfocar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enganchar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		engastar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enjaezar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enladrillar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enlutar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enredar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		enrollar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ensar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		entar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		entear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		envidar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		erar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		erbar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		erdear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		erear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		erezar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ergar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		eriar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		erizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ermanar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		erminar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ernar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		errar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		errear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ersar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ertar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		esar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		esenciar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		esollar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		espachurrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		estañar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		estar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		estrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		etar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		etear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		etillar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		etizar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		etoñar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		etrar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		eudar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		evar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ezar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		far
SFX V		 ar		 aría		fear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ferenciar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		fiar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ficar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		ficiar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		filetear
SFX V		 ar		 aría		finar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		firmar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		flamar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		flar
SFX V		 ar		 aría		formar
