hunspell/spanish.dic
abander/V
abatir/V
abobar/V
abonar/V
abrigar/V
abstenir/V
abuñuelar/V
acanchar/V
acarrer/V
acepcionar/V
achocar/V
aclimatar/V
acojinar/V
acorazar/V
acostumbrar/V
activarar/V
acumular/V
aderezar/V
adobir/V
adrogar/V
aerohidráulicar/V
afinar/V
agamitar/V
agorgojar/V
agrietar/V
aguerer/V
aherrumbrar/V
ahuchar/V
ajornalar/V
alancear/V
alcanforar/V
alegrar/V
alféizar/V
alicatar/V
aliviar/V
almácecir/V
alotar/V
alunitar/V
amamantar/V
ambentar/V
amilanar/V
amolar/V
amovar/V
amurallar/V
ancar/V
anguilar/V
anquilosar/V
anteveiar/V
antiparalelar/V
añonar/V
apandir/V
apealar/V
apersoñar/V
apitoñar/V
apoder/V
apostatar/V
aprontar/V
aqueiliar/V
arcar/V
argentar/V
arpistar/V
arredrar/V
arráezar/V
arrogar/V
arteriolar/V
asciender/V
asesorar/V
asonantar/V
astriñir/V
atafagar/V
ataner/V
atenazar/V
atiborrar/V
atondar/V
atruenar/V
ausentar/V
autorizar/V
avejigar/V
avocar/V
azofar/V
babear/V
bailar/V
baldear/V
bambonear/V
baratigir/V
barreñar/V
bastardear/V
batuquear/V
beldar/V
bernardar/V
bicípitar/V
bijar/V
bisbisear/V
blandonar/V
bolsar/V
braillar/V
broncear/V
busolfar/V
cachemir/V
caldear/V
camir/V
cantimplorar/V
caratar/V
carnerear/V
castrar/V
cazcalear/V
cencerrear/V
cerrajear/V
champurrar/V
checoslovacar/V
chivatear/V
cigarrar/V
circunnaver/V
cloacar/V
cociñar/V
colear/V
comediar/V
competir/V
conceber/V
condicionar/V
congestionar/V
consolar/V
contraatacar/V
contramandir/V
convencir/V
corambrar/V
correriar/V
covar/V
cronometrar/V
cuatrimstrar/V
culear/V
dagar/V
decidiar/V
degenerar/V
denostar/V
derrengar/V
desacotar/V
desalfombrar/V
desapercibir/V
desasiar/V
desbarrar/V
descampar/V
desciñar/V
desconcentrar/V
descrédecir/V
desdorar/V
desempedrar/V
desendiablar/V
desensamblar/V
desfacer/V
desguindar/V
desinflamar/V
desmajolar/V
desmolar/V
desosar/V
despeluzar/V
desplegar/V
desramar/V
destrabar/V
desvelar/V
detrajar/V
diñar/V
dignar/V
discípulir/V
disonar/V
dobladillar/V
dragar/V
efectuar/V
embañar/V
embebar/V
embotigir/V
emitir/V
empelotar/V
emponzonar/V
enarcar/V
encantar/V
encenagar/V
enclosurar/V
encrespar/V
endoselar/V
enfrmir/V
engendrar/V
enherbolar/V
enlodar/V
enrabiar/V
enrvir/V
ensoñar/V
entintar/V
entreoír/V
entubar/V
envidiar/V
erasmiañar/V
escamotar/V
escíncer/V
esculpar/V
espadillar/V
esplender/V
estancar/V
estomagar/V
estudír/V
examinar/V
expansionar/V
exquerir/V
extremar/V
famular/V
feder/V
filomar/V
flexionar/V
formalizar/V
franjar/V
frrar/V
futboler/V
ganguear/V
gedanitir/V
giorgir/V
gomar/V
grar/V
guachapear/V
guimbarder/V
hambrear/V
henchir/V
hidalgüir/V
historiar/V
hormiguear/V
humedecir/V
iluminar/V
importuñar/V
incidiar/V
incursionar/V
influistar/V
injerenciar/V
inselberg/V
intensificar/V
interviuvr/V
inventar/V
isomorfar/V
jardinar/V
judogir/V
lacear/V
lamir/V
latir/V
lenificar/V
licuefecir/V
listar/V
lobular/V
luminar/V
madreporar/V
maleficer/V
manar/V
manumitar/V
marsellir/V
mazñar/V
menguar/V
metalotermir/V
militarar/V
mixomar/V
momear/V
mordazar/V
mórbir/V
murer/V
narrar/V
niegar/V
nornordestar/V
obencar/V
octavar/V
oir/V
ominar/V
orientar/V
ozonar/V
palmar/V
papilionar/V
parirar/V
pasteurizar/V
pear/V
peltar/V
perdular/V
persar/V
petunír/V
pimpolludir/V
pitar/V
platear/V
poetizar/V
ponir/V
positronar/V
precautelar/V
preeligerir/V
prender/V
prevenir/V
profetizar/V
propender/V
prvar/V
pungir/V
quigir/V
rabonar/V
rarefagar/V
reaccionar/V
rebinar/V
recatar/V
recompensar/V
recorrar/V
recuperar/V
reengener/V
refrescastar/V
rehacer/V
rejuntar/V
remendar/V
renar/V
repercutar/V
repulgar/V
residenciar/V
restringir/V
retransmitar/V
revenir/V
riar/V
roastbeef/V
rosoler/V
rupstrar/V
safenar/V
salsifiar/V
santonar/V
secreterir/V
semilunar/V
sermonear/V
sifílidar/V
sirgar/V
sobredimensionar/V
socializar/V
solucionar/V
soterrar/V
subóptir/V
sucumber/V
superalimentar/V
sustentar/V
tajear/V
tararirar/V
telear/V
tequilar/V
tiernar/V
toñar/V
totar/V
transaminar/V
tranviar/V
trasmigreír/V
travesear/V
trigesimonovenar/V
trompear/V
tunantear/V
ulcer/V
urbanizar/V
vaharinar/V
veintenar/V
vergüir/V
vicunar/V
visualizar/V
vulcanitir/V
zaherir/V
zepelinar/V
